Hawaii statutes.
[§171-154] Authority to lease coastal
lands. The board, subject to this chapter, may lease public coastal lands
under the board's jurisdiction for the purpose of generating revenues to be
deposited into the beach restoration [special] fund. Any terms and conditions
imposed by the board on the lessee shall run with the land and shall be binding
on the lessee's heirs, successors, and assigns. The board may seek enforcement
of such terms and conditions in any court of appropriate jurisdiction. [L 1999,
c 84, pt of §2]

Note

The amendment made by
L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next